Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5728
Tobacco retail outlet, defined.

Tobacco retail outlet means a store that sells only tobacco and products directly related to tobacco. Products directly related to tobacco do not include alcohol, coffee, soft drinks, candy, groceries, or gasoline.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 13.